Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2619.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 26-126, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE26-126. Violations; classifications A. A person who knowingly fails or refuses to give information or gives false information to the county recorder or other enrolling officer relating to a subject of inquiry under the provisions of this article is guilty of a class 2 misdemeanor. B. A county recorder or other enrolling officer who knowingly fails or refuses to perform a duty prescribed by this chapter, or who falsifies a record pertaining thereto, is guilty of a petty offense. END_STATUTE